Washington statutes.
RCW 6.13.060

Conveyance or encumbrance by spouses or domestic partners.

The homestead of a spouse or domestic partner cannot be conveyed or encumbered unless the instrument by which it is conveyed or encumbered is executed and acknowledged by both spouses or both domestic partners, except that either spouse or both or either domestic partner or both jointly may make and execute powers of attorney for the conveyance or encumbrance of the homestead. The conveyance or encumbrance of the homestead does not require that any dependent of the owner who is not a spouse or domestic partner execute and acknowledge the instrument by which it is conveyed or encumbered.

[ 2021 c 290 s 4; 2008 c 6 s 634; 1987 c 442 s 206; 1983 c 251 s 1; 1895 c 64 s 6; RRS s 534. Formerly RCW 6.12.110.]

NOTES:

Findings—Effective date—2021 c 290: See notes following RCW 6.13.010.

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.

Married persons and domestic partners, property: Chapter 26.16 RCW.